North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47C. North Carolina Condominium Act.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums.

§ 47C-2-101.
Execution and recordation of declaration.

A declaration creating a condominium shall be executed in the same manner as a deed, shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located.

A declaration or an amendment to a declaration adding units to a condominium must contain a certificate executed by an architect licensed under the provisions of Chapter 83A of the General Statutes or an engineer registered under the provisions of Chapter
89C of the General Statutes stating that the plans for such building or buildings fully and accurately depict the structural components and mechanical systems of all buildings containing or comprising any units thereby created;
provided, however, that such requirement shall not apply to any unit or portion of a unit, the boundaries of which comprise solely surface space, airspace, subterranean space, or any specified combination thereof, as provided in
G.S. 47C-2-105(a)(5).

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2012-18, s. 1.5; 2020-52, s. 4.

§ 47C-2-102.
Unit boundaries.

Except as provided by the declaration:

If walls, floors or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, then all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring and any other materials constituting any part of the finished flooring,
and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces thereof are a part of the unit; and all other portions of such walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements.

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, bearing wall, bearing column, or any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion thereof serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated
exclusively to that unit, and any portion thereof serving more than one unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2), all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit.

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, decks, porches, balconies, patios, and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit but located outside the unit’s boundaries are limited common elements allocated
exclusively to that unit.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-103.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities may not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to G.S. 47C-3-102(a)(1).

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with this chapter.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with this chapter. Whether a substantial failure to comply with this chapter impairs marketability
shall be determined by the law of this State relating to marketability.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-104.
Description of units.

A description of a condominium unit which sets forth the name of the condominium, the recording data for the declaration, and the identifying number of the unit or which otherwise complies with the general requirements of the laws of this State concerning
description of real property is sufficient legal description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit which were created by the declaration or bylaws.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-105.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration for a condominium must contain all of the following:

The name of the condominium, which must include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium”, and the name of the association.

The name of every county in which any part of the condominium is situated.

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the condominium.

A statement of the maximum number of units which the declarant reserves the right to create.

A description, by reference to the plats or plans described in

G.S. 47C-2-109

, of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number. A declaration may define a unit to include all or any portion of the airspace or subterranean space
between two legally identifiable elevations, to include or exclude the surface of a legally described parcel of real property, to include or exclude airspace lying above and subterranean space lying below such surface,
and to mean any specified combination of the foregoing, whether or not contiguous.

A description of any limited common elements, other than those specified in subsections 47C-2-102(2) and (4), as provided in

G.S. 47C-2-109

(b)(7).

A description of any real estate (except real estate subject to development rights) which may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in subsections 47C-2-102(2) and (4), together with a statement
that they may be so allocated.

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant, together with a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of those rights applies, and a time limit within or date by which each
of those rights must be exercised; provided, however, that if no time limit or date is specified for the exercise of any particular development right or other special declarant right is specified in the declaration, the
time limit for the exercise of that right shall be seven years from the date the declaration was recorded or by July 1, 2027, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the unit owners of units to which at least
sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes in the association are allocated, exclusive of any votes appurtenant to any unit owned by the declarant, may consent to an extension, not exceeding 10 years from the expiration of
any time limit for the exercise of any development right or special declarant right as specified in the declaration. An extension of a development right or special declarant right is effective upon recording of an amendment
to the declaration approved by the unit owners as provided in this subdivision, provided that such amendment must be recorded prior to the expiration of the development right or special declarant right affected by such
amendment. Approval by the required number of unit owners may be evidenced by execution of the amendment by the requisite number of unit owners or by certification of an officer of the association executing such amending
confirming that the requisite number of unit owners approved such amendment at a duly called meeting of the unit owners.

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect, together with (i) either a statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and regulating the order in which those
portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards, and (ii) a statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of
the real estate subject to that development right, that development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate.

Any other conditions or limitations under which the rights described in paragraph (8) may be exercised or will lapse.

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in

G.S. 47C-2-107

.

Any restrictions on use, occupancy, or alienation of the units.

The recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to or included in the condominium or to which any portion of the condominium is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration.

All matters required by

G.S. 47C-2-106

, 47C-2-107, 47C-2-108, 47C-2-109, 47C-2-115, 47C-2-116, and 47C-3-103(d).

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant deems appropriate.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2020-52, s. 2.

§ 47C-2-106.
Leasehold condominiums.

Any lease, or a memorandum thereof, the expiration or termination of which may terminate the condominium or reduce its size shall be recorded. Every lessor of those leases must sign the declaration, and the declaration shall state:

Where the complete lease may be inspected;

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner whereby those rights may be exercised or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements after the expiration or termination of the lease or a statement that they do not have those rights; and

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal or a statement that they do not have those rights.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium is recorded, neither the lessor nor his successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who, after demand, makes timely payment of his share of the rent determined in proportion
to his common element interest and otherwise complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner’s leasehold interest is not affected by failure of any other person to pay
rent or fulfill any other covenant under the lease.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a condominium, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with

G.S. 47C-1-107(a)

as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-107.
Allocation of common element, interests, votes, and common expense liabilities.

The declaration shall allocate a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association and a portion of the votes in the association to each unit and state the formulas used to establish those
allocations. Those allocations may not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, the declaration must state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the condominium after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide: (i) that different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration; (ii) for cumulative voting only for the purpose of electing members of the executive board; and (iii) for
class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class. A declarant may not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by
this chapter nor may units constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements and common expense liabilities allocated at any time to all the units must each equal one if stated as fractions or one hundred percent (100%) if stated
as percentages. If the declaration allocates to each of the units a fraction or percentage of ownership of the common elements that results in an actual total of such fractions or percentages that is greater or less than the actual
whole of such ownership, each unit’s ownership of the common elements shall be automatically reallocated so that each unit is allocated the same fraction or percentage of ownership of the actual whole as that unit had of the actual
total that was greater or less than the actual whole. The declarant or the association shall file an amendment to the declaration reflecting such reallocation which amendment need not be executed by any other party.

The common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated
is void.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-108.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in subsections 47C-2-102(2) and (4), the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation may not be altered without the unanimous consent of the
unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by all the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocations is made. The persons executing the amendment shall
provide a copy thereof to the association, which shall record it. The amendment shall be recorded in the same manner as a deed in the names of the parties and the condominium.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element may not be so allocated except by unanimous consent or pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with G.S. 47C-2-105(a)(7). All such allocations shall be made by
amendments to the declaration and shall become effective in accordance with

G.S. 47C-2-117(c)

.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-109.
Plats and plans.

The declarant shall file with the register of deeds in each county where the condominium is located the condominium’s plat or plan prepared in accordance with this section. The plat or plan shall be considered a part of the declaration but shall be recorded
separately, and the declaration shall refer by number to the file where such plat or plan is recorded.

Each plat or plan or combination thereof must show all of the following:

The name and a survey or general schematic map of the entire condominium.

The location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights or subject only to the development right to withdraw and the location and dimensions of all existing improvements within that real estate.

The location and dimensions of any real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel.

The extent of any encroachments by or upon any portion of the condominium.

The location and dimensions of all easements having specific location and dimensions and serving or burdening any portion of the condominium.

The verified statement of an architect licensed under the provisions of Chapter 83A of the General Statutes or an engineer registered under the provisions of Chapter 89C of the General Statutes certifying that such plats or plans fully and accurately
depict (i) the locations and dimensions of the horizontally limiting boundaries of each unit, to the extent those boundaries lie within or coincide with the boundaries of the building in which the unit is located, (ii)
the location of any vertically limiting boundaries, with reference to established datum, and (iii) an identifying number for each unit.

(6a)
The certification of a Professional Land Surveyor licensed under the provisions of Chapter 89C of the General Statutes, that the plat conforms to the requirements of subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5),
(7), (8), and (9) of this subsection. The location and dimensions referred to in these subdivisions shall be expressed in the plat in azimuths or courses and distances. Distances shall be in feet or meters and decimals
thereof. Tie lines to an external boundary which is itself located and dimensioned are required for buildings containing or comprising any units that are not coincident with said external boundary. Each vertically limiting
unit boundary (commonly known as elevation) shall be expressed in feet or meters and decimals as the distance above the referenced datum. The certification required by this subsection shall also state that the plat
meets the requirements of NCAC Title 21, Chapter 56 (Board Rules).

The locations and dimensions of limited common elements; however, parking spaces and the limited common elements described in subsections 47C-2-102(2) and (4) need not be shown, except for decks, stoops, porches, balconies, and patios.

A legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate.”

The distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the condominium.

Any unit in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvement to be constructed anywhere within the condominium. Any contemplated improvement shown must be labeled either “MUST BE BUILT” or “NEED NOT BE BUILT”.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record either new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), and (c) or new certifications of plats and plans previously recorded if those plats and plans
otherwise conform to the requirements of those subsections.

In order to be recorded, plats or plans prepared under subsection (b) of this section shall comply with G.S. 47-30(a) and with either G.S. 47-30(b) or G.S. 47-30(o).

The fee for recording each plat or plan sheet submitted shall be as prescribed by G.S. 161-10(a)(3).

The provisions of this Article and of condominium instruments recorded pursuant thereto shall be liberally construed in favor of the valid establishment of a condominium with respect to the submitted property.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 1987, c. 282, s. 8; 1989, c. 571; 2012-18, s. 1.6; 2020-52, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-110.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under G.S. 47C-2-105(a)(8), the declarant shall record an amendment to the declaration (G.S. 47C-2-117) and comply with

G.S. 47C-2-109

. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby created. The amendment to the declaration must assign an identifying number to each new unit created and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of
units described in subsection (c), reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment must describe any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements,
designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by

G.S. 47C-2-108

(Limited Common Elements).

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the condominium if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by, and is in compliance with,

G.S. 47C-2-105

and, if a leasehold condominium,

G.S. 47C-2-106

and also if the plats and plans include all matters required by

G.S. 47C-2-109

. This provision does not extend the limit on the exercise of developmental rights imposed by the declaration pursuant to

G.S. 47C-2-105

(a)(8).

When a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain; or

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration must reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the
subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides pursuant to G.S. 47C-2-105(a)(8) that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, no part of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser; and

If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no part of a portion may be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-111.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner:

May make any improvements or alterations to his unit that do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium;

May not change the appearance of the common elements or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the condominium without permission of the association; and

May, after acquiring an adjoining unit, remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if the partition is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity or mechanical systems or lessen the support
of any portion of the condominium. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this paragraph is not an alteration of boundaries.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-112.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated upon application to the association by the owners of those units. Any such application to the association must be in such
form and contain such data as may be reasonably required by the association and be accompanied by a plat prepared by an architect licensed under the provisions of Chapter 83 [83A] of the General Statutes or an engineer registered
under the provisions of Chapter 89C of the General Statutes detailing the relocation of the boundaries between the affected units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their
allocated interests, the application must state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines within 30 days that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association, at the expense of the owners filing the
application, shall prepare and record an amendment to the declaration that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners and the association, contains words of conveyance, and is indexed
in the name of the grantor and the grantee by the register of deeds.

The association, at the expense of the unit owners filing the application, shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-113.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two or more units. Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, upon application of a unit owner to subdivide a unit, the association, at the expense of
the unit owner, shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration, including the plats and plans, subdividing that unit.

The amendment to the declaration must be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable
manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-114.
Monuments as boundaries.

The existing physical boundaries of a unit or the physical boundaries of a unit reconstructed in substantial accordance with the description contained in the original declaration are its legal boundaries, rather than the boundaries derived from the description
contained in the original declaration, regardless of vertical or lateral movement of the building or minor variance between those boundaries and the boundaries derived from the description contained in the original declaration.
This section does not relieve a unit owner of liability for willful misconduct or relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to any plats and plans or, in a cooperative, for failure to adhere to
any representation in the public offering statement.

With respect to all condominiums created prior to October 1, 1986, the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed to apply to such condominiums, unless an action asserting otherwise shall have been brought within six months from October
1, 1986.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2020-52, s. 5.

§ 47C-2-115.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in units or on common elements in the condominium only if the declaration so provides and specifies the rights of a declarant with regard to the number, size, location, and relocation
thereof. Any sales office, management office, or model not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element, and if a declarant ceases to be a unit owner, he ceases to have any rights with regard thereto unless it is removed
promptly from the condominium in accordance with a right to remove reserved in the declaration. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the condominium. The provisions
of this section are subject to the provisions of other State law and to local ordinances.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-116.
Easement to facilitate exercise of special declarant rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has such easements through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights whether arising under
this Chapter or reserved in the declaration.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-2-117.
Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under G.S. 47C-2-109(d) or 47C-2-110, the association under

G.S. 47C-1-107

, 47C-1-106(d) [47C-2-106(d)], 47C-2-112(a), or 47C-2-113, or certain unit owners under G.S. 47C-2-108(b), 47C-2-112(a), 47C-2-113(b), or 47C-2-118(b), and except as limited by subsection (d), the declaration may
be amended only by affirmative vote of or a written agreement signed by, unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger majority the declaration specifies.
The declaration may specify a smaller number only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

Provided that the approval requirements for any amendment adopted pursuant to this section or G.S. 47C-2-105(a)(8) have been met, no action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section or pursuant to G.S.
47C-2-105(a)(8) may be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment shall be indexed in the Grantee’s index in the name of the condominium and the
association and in the Grantor’s index in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this Chapter, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, or change the boundaries of any unit, the allocated interest of a unit,
or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

Amendments to the declaration required by this Chapter to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence
of designation, by the president of the association.

The provisions of this Article and of condominium instruments recorded pursuant thereto shall be liberally construed in favor of the valid establishment of a condominium with respect to the submitted property. Except as otherwise provided in the declaration
or explicitly prohibited by this Chapter, if any amendment to the declaration is necessary in the judgment of the executive board, then the executive board may, at its discretion, propose an amendment to the declaration for any
of the following purposes:

To cure any ambiguity, to establish marketable title to units, or to correct or supplement any provision of the declaration, including plats or plans, that is defective, missing, or inconsistent with any other provision of the declaration or with this
Chapter.

To conform to the requirements of any agency or entity that has established national or regional standards with respect to loans secured by mortgages or deeds of trust on units in condominium projects, such as the Federal National Mortgage Association
or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

To comply with any statute, regulation, code, or ordinance which may be applicable to the condominium or association.

To make a reasonable accommodation or permit a reasonable modification in favor of persons with disabilities, as may be defined by federal or State laws or regulations applicable to the association or its employees, unit owners, residents, or tenants.The
authority granted to the executive board under this subsection does not limit the authority of the executive board to propose any amendment for any other purpose permitted in the declaration or by this Chapter. Upon approval
by the executive board of an amendment pursuant to this subsection, the executive board shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the amendment not less than 10 nor more than 60 days
after mailing of notice of such meeting, which notice shall include a copy or summary of the proposed amendment. There shall be no requirement that a quorum be present at the meeting. The amendment is ratified by the unit
owners unless at that meeting unit owners holding a majority of the votes in the association reject the amendment. Any amendment recorded pursuant to this subsection in the office of the register of deeds in the county
or counties where the condominium is located shall operate as correction of the declaration being corrected that relates back to, and is effective as of, the date the declaration being corrected was originally recorded
in the office of the register of deeds, with the same effect as if the declaration were correct when the declaration was first recorded.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2020-52, s. 3(a).

§ 47C-2-117.1.
Judicial reformation of declaration.

A unit owners’ association may bring a civil action in superior court in the county where the condominium or the greater part thereof is located to reform the condominium instruments to resolve ambiguities, errors, or inconsistencies in the condominium
instruments that are the source of legal and other disputes pertaining to the legal rights and responsibilities of the unit owners’ association or individual unit owners. The condominium instruments may also be reformed to correct
scrivener’s errors, including incorrectly identifying the unit owners’ association, incorrectly identifying an entity other than the unit owners’ association, or errors arising from oversight or from an inadvertent omission or
mathematical mistake.The superior court shall have jurisdiction over matters set forth in

G.S. 47C-2-117

(f) regarding ownership of marketable title of the common elements or units and may, upon consideration of pleadings and such other matters as the court may in its exercise of equity allow, order (i) reformation,
in whole or in part, of any provision of the condominium instruments and (ii) correction of mistakes or any other error in the condominium instruments that may exist with respect to the declaration for any other purpose set forth
in

G.S. 47C-2-117

.1(f).

A complaint filed by the unit owners’ association with the court setting forth any inconsistency or error made in the condominium instruments, or the necessity for any change therein, shall be deemed sufficient basis for the reformation, in whole or in
part, of the condominium instruments, provided that all of the following requirements have been met:

The unit owners’ association has made at least three good-faith attempts to convene a duly called meeting of the unit owners’ association to present for consideration amendments to the condominium instruments for the reasons specified in the complaint,
and where the attempts to convene a duly called meeting have been unsuccessful as evidenced by an affidavit verified by oath of the principal officer of the unit owners’ association.

Where the declarant of the condominium still owns a unit or continues to have any special declarant rights in the condominium, the declarant has joined in the complaint of the unit owners’ association.

A copy of the complaint has been served in accordance with Rule 4(j), 4(j1), or Rule 4(j5) of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure on all unit owners and all beneficiaries of a deed of trust or mortgagees of record for a unit in the condominium.

The complaint notifies the recipient that if the recipient does not timely respond to the complaint pursuant to Article 3 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, then the relief sought may be granted by the clerk of superior court.

No written response objecting to or disputing the petition is received within 45 days from the date the last person to be served was served with the complaint as evidenced by an affidavit verified by oath of the principal officer of the unit owners’ association.

If the response of any person served with the complaint objects to or disputes the complaint, the action shall be transferred to the civil docket of the superior court for further proceedings.

Any unit owner or beneficiary of a deed of trust or mortgagee of a condominium unit in the condominium objecting to or disputing the complaint shall have standing to participate in the reformation action. No reformation pursuant to this section shall
affect the rights, priority of the lien, or otherwise materially impair or affect any condominium unit as collateral for a deed of trust or mortgage, or affect a beneficiary of a deed of trust or mortgagee’s right to foreclose
on a condominium unit as collateral without the duly acknowledged written consent of the beneficiary of the deed of trust or mortgagee.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent or preclude any unit owner or owners, at any time, from filing an action in superior court for judicial reformation related to the title, formation, or construction of the condominium declaration, plat or
plans, to establish marketable title to the owner’s or owners’ unit or units.

In any action brought under this section, the person prosecuting the reformation action must file a notice of pending litigation complying with Article 11 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

The period prescribed for the commencement of a collateral action contesting a judgment ordering reformation or correction under this section shall be one year from the date of entry of the judgment. This subsection does not apply to an action for damages
sustained by any party as a result of the reformation or correction.

History.
2020-52, s. 3(b).